incubator/apertium-rup/apertium-rup.rup.dix
    <pardef n="apr/ochiu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>ochiu</l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>uchiamu</l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>uchiamu</l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>uchiai</l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>uchiatâ</l><r>ochiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="apu/nu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>nu</l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>sâ</l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>sâ</l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>neamu</l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>niri</l><r>nu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ar/adzimu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>adzimu</l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âdzimamu</l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>âdzimamu</l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âdzimai</l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>âdzimatâ</l><r>adzimu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="arâb/oșiu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>oșiu</l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>ușiamu</l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ușiamu</l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>ușiai</l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>ușiatâ</l><r>oșiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="apr"><i>ochiu</i><par n="apr/ochiu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="apu"><i>nu</i><par n="apu/nu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="ar"><i>adzimu</i><par n="ar/adzimu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="arâb"><i>oșiu</i><par n="arâb/oșiu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="disrâb"><i>oșiu</i><par n="arâb/oșiu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="ngr"><i>oșiu</i><par n="arâb/oșiu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="dizgr"><i>oșiu</i><par n="arâb/oșiu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="ns"><i>ochiu</i><par n="apr/ochiu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="spu"><i>nu</i><par n="apu/nu__vblex"/></e>
